Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-5,138
Mobile home, defined.

Mobile home shall mean every transportable or relocatable device of any description containing complete independent living facilities for one or more persons whether or not permanently attached to the real estate upon which it is situated and shall include a manufactured home as defined in section 71-4603.

Laws 1981, LB 296, § 7;

Laws 1985, LB 313, § 27.